Vermont statutes. TITLE 10A Vermont Fish and Wildlife Regulations
Subchapter 2. Birds

§ 21.
Seasons, bag limits.

Game birds of the species listed in column one of the Table set forth below may be taken during the period specified in column two in the number specified in column three, and may be possessed only in the numbers specified in column three as “possession
limits.”

Column One Column Two Column Three BIRD SEASON BAG LIMIT (a) Migratory game birds, all species In accordance with Federal regulations In accordance with Federal regulations (b) Partridge (ruffed grouse) Last Saturday in September to December 31, inclusive
4 daily limit 8 possession limit (c) Pheasant Last Saturday in September to December 31, inclusive 2 daily limit 4 possession limit (d) Wild Turkey see § 22, post see § 22, post (e) Quail Last Saturday in September to last Thursday
before regular deer season, inclusive 4 daily limit 8 possession limit (1) Bobwhite Quail No closed season None (f) Chukar No closed season None Partridge (g) Others No open season (h) Crow Friday through Monday only, inclusive, January
15 — April 11 and August 19 — December 19 No limit

Click to view

HISTORY:
Added

1961, No. 119
, § 2, eff. May 9, 1961; amended 1963, Fish and Game Board Reg. No.—, eff. Aug. 23, 1963; 1965, Fish and Game Board Reg. No.—, eff. Sept. 13, 1965; 1968, Fish and Game Board Reg. No.—, eff. Jan. 6, 1968; 1975, Fish and
Game Board Reg. No. 891, eff. Sept. 1, 1975; 1978, Fish and Game Board Reg. No. 908, eff. Oct. 31, 1978; 1980, Fish and Game Board Reg. No. 921, eff. Jan. 1, 1981; 1980, Fish and Game Board Reg. No. 922, eff. Oct. 27, 1980; 1984, Fish
and Wildlife Board Reg. No. 952, eff. Sept. 17, 1984; 1989, Fish and Wildlife Board Reg. No. 979, eff. Nov. 24, 1989; 1991, Fish and Wildlife Board Reg. No. 988, eff. Sept. 1991; 2015, Fish and Wildlife Board Reg., eff. January 1,
2016.

§ 22.
Turkey Seasons.

Authority

This rule is adopted pursuant to

10 V.S.A. § 4081(a)
. In adopting this rule, the Fish and Wildlife Board is following the policy established by the General Assembly that the protection, propagation, control, management, and conservation of fish, wildlife and furbearing
animals in this State is in the interest of the public welfare and that the safeguarding of this valuable resource for the people of the State requires a constant and continual vigilance.

In accordance with

10 V.S.A. § 4082
, this rule is designed to maintain the best health, population and utilization levels of the turkey flock.

In accordance with

10 V.S.A. § 4084
, this rule establishes daily, season and possession limits for game, territorial limits, and the manner and means of taking; to establish territorial limits for the taking of turkeys; and to establish restrictions
on taking based upon sex, maturity or other physical distinction.

Purpose The purpose of this regulation is to establish seasons for the taking of turkeys, to establish open Wildlife Management Units (WMUs) for the taking of turkeys, to establish methods of taking turkeys and to establish limits on the number of turkeys
to be taken.

Definitions.

“Commissioner” means the Commissioner of the Vermont Fish and Wildlife Department.

“Crossbow” means a device consisting of a bow mounted to a rigid stock for discharging bolts or arrows and having a mechanical means to hold and release the drawn string, which must be fired from the shoulder. A bolt means a short projectile for a crossbow
that resembles an arrow and has a head that measures no less than 7/8 inch at its widest point. A crossbow shall have a minimum pull of 125 pounds, a working mechanical safety and a stock no less than 23 inches in length.

“Legal means” means the taking of a turkey by shotgun, crossbow, or archery equipment in conformance with Section 6 of this rule.

“Novice” means a person who obtained their first hunting license within the past 12 months and is 16 years of age or older.

“Wildlife Management Unit” (WMU) means one of 21 geographical areas in Vermont for which big game regulations may vary.

“Youth” means a person who is 15 years of age or younger.

Spring Season.

Dates: May 1, through May 31, inclusive.

Shooting hours: One-half hour before sunrise to twelve noon.

Legal turkey: Only wild turkeys with beard(s).

Bag Limit: Two bearded wild turkeys per person per season.

Open WMUs: Open statewide

Fall Season.

Dates and Open WMU’s.

Bow and Arrow, and crossbow only:

Dates: From the 1st Saturday in October to the beginning of the shotgun/bow and arrow/crossbow season.

Open WMUs: Open Statewide

Shotgun/Bow & Arrow/Crossbow Season

Dates: Nine consecutive days beginning 21 days prior to the regular deer season, inclusive.

Open WMUs: B, D, G, H, I, J, L, M, O, P, and Q and their respective subunits.

Shotgun/Bow & Arrow/Crossbow Season

Dates: For 16 consecutive days beginning 21 days prior to the regular deer season, inclusive.

Open WMUs: subunits: WMUs F, K, and N and their respective subunits:.

Shooting hours: One-half hour before sunrise to one-half hour after sunset.

Legal Turkey: Any wild turkey.

Bag limit: One turkey per person.

Legal Method of Taking:

Only a shotgun, crossbow, or bow and arrow may be used.

Only number 2 or smaller size shot shall be used or possessed.

An arrowhead must be at least 7/8th of an inch in width and have two or more cutting edges.

Rifles shall not be used or carried by any person while hunting turkeys. A person taking a turkey with a crossbow or bow and arrow may carry a handgun in accordance with

10 V.S.A. § 4252(b)
, however, that person may not use the handgun to take turkey.

No person shall use dogs in the spring, nor electronic calling devices, bait, live decoys, or participate in cooperative drives during either season.

Any person wishing to hunt turkey with a crossbow or bow and arrow must hold proof of having held an archery license or a certificate of satisfactory completion of a bowhunter education course from Vermont or another state or province of Canada which
is approved by the Commissioner.

Unless it is uncocked, a person shall not possess or transport a crossbow in or on a motor vehicle, motorboat, airplane, snowmobile, or other motor-propelled vehicle except as permitted in accordance with

10 V.S.A. § 4705
.

Youth Turkey Hunting Weekend

Youth turkey hunting weekend shall be the Saturday and Sunday prior to opening day of spring turkey season on May 1. Legal shooting hours shall be one half hour before sunrise until 5 p.m.

Legal Turkey: Only bearded turkeys may be taken.

Bag limit: One bearded turkey per youth. A youth may also hunt during the spring season and take two bearded turkeys during that season.

To participate in the youth turkey hunt, a qualified youth must be 15 years of age or younger and have a valid Vermont hunting and turkey license and a youth turkey hunting weekend license.

The youth must be accompanied by an unarmed adult who hold a valid Vermont hunting license and who is 18 years of age or older. An adult accompanying a youth under this section shall accompany no more than two young people at one time. As used in this
section, “accompany,” “accompanied,” or “accompanying” means direct control and supervision, including the ability to see and communicate with the youth hunter without the aid of artificial devices such as radios or binoculars,
except for medically necessary devices such as hearing aids or eyeglasses.

No youth shall hunt under this section on privately owned land without first obtaining the permission of the owner or occupant.

Novice Turkey Hunting Weekend

Novice Turkey Hunting Weekend: This season shall be concurrent with the Youth Turkey Hunting Weekend as prescribed in

10 V.S.A. § 4908
and section 7.1 of this rule.

Limit: One bearded turkey per novice. A novice may also hunt during the spring season and take two bearded turkeys during that season.

To participate in the novice turkey hunting weekend, a qualified person must have a valid Vermont hunting and turkey license and a novice turkey hunting weekend license and follow the requirements of youth turkey hunting weekend.

The novice must be accompanied by an unarmed adult who holds a valid Vermont hunting license and who is 18 years of age or older. An adult accompanying a novice under this section shall accompany no more than two novice hunters at one time. As used in
this section, “accompany,” :accompanied,” or “accompanying” means direct control and supervision, including the ability to see and communicate with the novice hunter without the aid of artificial devices such as radios or binoculars,
except for medically necessary devices such as hearing aids or eyeglasses.

No novice shall hunt under this section on privately owned land without first obtaining the permission of the owner or occupant.

HISTORY:
Added 1982, Fish and Game Board Reg. No. 938, §§ 1-3, eff. Jan. 1, 1983; amended

1983, No. 158
(Adj. Sess.), eff. April 13, 1984; 1985, Fish and Wildlife Board Reg. No. 956, eff. March 7, 1985; 1985, Fish and Wildlife Board Reg. No. 957, eff. July 5, 1985; 1987, Fish and Wildlife Board Reg. No. 957, eff. Jan. 1,
1987; 1988, Fish and Wildlife Board Reg. No. 974, eff. April 12, 1988; 1990, Fish and Wildlife Board Reg. No. 981, eff. April 27, 1990; 1992, Fish and Wildlife Board Reg. No. 981, eff. November 14, 1992; 1993, Fish and Wildlife Board
Reg. No. 996, eff. April 22, 1993; 1993, Fish and Wildlife Board Reg. No. in subsec. (E) 1007, eff. Feb. 13, 1994; 1998, Fish and Wildlife Board Reg. No. 1007, eff. April 3, 1998; 1999, Fish and Wildlife Board Reg. No. 1007, eff. Feb.
17, 1999; 2002, Fish and Wildlife Board Reg. No. 1007, eff. Aug. 3, 2002; 2003, Fish and Wildlife Board Reg. No. 1007a, eff. Feb. 12, 2003, 2003, Fish and Wildlife Board Reg. No. 1007, eff. March 5, 2004, 2010, Fish and Wildlife Board
Reg. eff. July 9, 2010; 2015, Fish and Wildlife Board Reg., eff. Jan. 1, 2016; 2016, Fish and Wildlife Board Reg., eff. Jan. 1, 2017; 2019, Fish and Wildlife Board Reg., eff. Jan. 1, 2020; 2020, Fish and Wildlife Board Reg., eff Oct.
15, 2020.

§ 22a.
Taking of turkey doing damage.

A landowner, or the landowner’s authorized agent, with prior approval from a Game Warden, may take, on land owned or occupied by the landowner and not posted except as provided in

10 V.S.A. § 4710
, a turkey which the landowner can prove, has repeatedly, or may continue to substantially damage the following:

a crop bearing plant; or

a crop, except grass; or

a crop which has been harvested and stored.

A landowner may designate one individual who holds a resident Vermont hunting license as an agent to take a turkey doing damage, pursuant to subsection (A) of this section, on the landowner’s behalf. A landowner may not offer or accept any form of payment
to or from a person designated as an agent under this subsection except as allowed in subsection (E) of this section.

The landowner shall immediately report the wounding or killing of a turkey under this section to a Game Warden. Within 12 hours of said wounding or killing of a turkey under this section, the landowner or person who performed the act shall submit a written,
signed report relating the date, time, place and reason for the wounding or killing to a Game Warden.

A person who kills the turkey shall immediately properly dress the carcass and care for the meat.

The Game Warden shall immediately investigate the case and if satisfied that the turkey was taken as provided in this section, the Warden shall give the landowner a certificate of his or her finding in the matter. The certificate shall entitle the landowner
to the ownership of the carcass. The landowner may not sell or give away the carcass except to offer all or a portion of it to the agent designated under subsection (B) of this section as compensation for killing the turkey. Any
carcass not desired for home consumption in the household of the certificate holder or designated agent shall be turned over to a Game Warden.

HISTORY:
Added 2002, Fish and Wildlife Board Reg. No. 1007a, eff. Sept. 7, 2002.

§ 23.
Methods of taking, possessing and transporting migratory game birds.

Scope of Regulations.

In general. The regulations contained in this section relate only to the hunting of migratory game birds, and crows.

Procedural and substantive requirements. Migratory game birds may be taken, possessed, transported, shipped, exported, or imported only in accordance with the restrictions, conditions, and requirements contained in this section. Crows may be taken,
possessed, transported, exported, or imported only in accordance with subsections 32.0 through 34.0 of this section.

Relation to Other Provisions.

Migratory bird hunting stamps. The provisions of this section are in addition to the provisions of the Migratory Bird Hunting Stamp Act of 1934 (48 Stat. 451, as amended; 16 U.S.C. 718a).

National wildlife refuges. The provisions of this section are in addition to, and are not in lieu of, any other provision of law respecting migratory game birds under the National Wildlife Refuge System Administration Act of 1966 (80 Stat. 927, as amended;
16 U.S.C. 668dd) or any regulation made pursuant thereto.

Each person hunting migratory game birds in Vermont shall annually register with the Vermont Department of Fish and Wildlife’s Harvest Information Program (H.I.P.), and must be able to provide proof of the H.I.P. registration.

Definitions. For the purpose of this section, the following terms shall be construed, respectively, to mean and to include:

“Migratory game birds” means those migratory birds included in the terms of conventions between the United States and any foreign country for the protection of migratory birds, for which open seasons are prescribed in this section and belong to the following
families:

(i)
Anatidae (ducks, geese, brant, and swans);

(ii)
Columbidae (doves and pigeons);

(iii)
Gruidae (little brown cranes);

(iv)
Rallidae (rails, coots, and gallinules); and

(v)
Scolpacidae (woodcock and snipe).

“Open season” means the days on which migratory game birds may lawfully be taken. Each period prescribed as an open season shall be construed to include the first and last days thereof.

“Closed season” means the days on which migratory game birds shall not be taken.

“Daily bag limit” means the maximum number of migratory game birds permitted to be taken by one person in any one day during the open season in any one specified geographic area for which a daily bag limit is prescribed.

“Possession limit” means the number of migratory game birds permitted to be possessed by any one person when lawfully taken in the state for which a possession limit is prescribed.

“Personal abode” means one’s principal or ordinary home or dwelling place, as distinguished from his or her temporary or transient place of abode or dwelling such as a hunting club, or any club house, cabin, tent, or trailer house used as a hunting club,
or any hotel, motel, or rooming house used during a hunting, pleasure, or business trip.

“Migratory bird preservation facility” means:

(i)
Any person who, at his or her residence or place of business and for hire or other consideration; or

(ii)
Any taxidermist, cold-storage facility or locker plant which, for hire or other consideration; or

(iii)
Any hunting club which, in the normal course of operations, receives, possesses, or has in custody any migratory game birds belonging to another person for purposes of picking, cleaning, freezing, processing, storage,
or shipment.

“Paraplegic” means an individual afflicted with paralysis of the lower half of the body with involvement of both legs usually due to disease of or injury to the spinal cord.

“Nontoxic shot” includes steel, bismuth/tin, tungsten/iron, tungsten/polymer, tungsten/matrix, tungsten/nickel/iron, tungsten/iron/nickel/tin, tungsten/bronze, tungsten/tin/bismuth, tungsten/iron/copper/nickel, tungsten/tin/iron, or other shot approved
by the U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service.

With a trap, snare, net, crossbow, rifle, pistol, swivel gun, shotgun larger than 10 gauge, punt gun, battery gun, machinegun, fish hook, poison, drug, explosive, or stupefying substance;

With a shotgun of any description capable of holding more than three shells, unless it is plugged with an on-piece filler, incapable of removal without disassembling the gun, so its total capacity does not exceed three shells;

From or by means, aid, or use of a sinkbox or any other type of low floating device, having a depression affording the hunter a means of concealment beneath the surface of the water;

From or by means, aid, or use of any motor vehicle, motor-driven land conveyance, or aircraft of any kind, except that paraplegics and persons missing one or both legs may take from any stationary motor vehicle or stationary motor-driven land conveyance;

From or by means of any motorboat or other craft having a motor attached, or any sailboat, unless the motor has been completely shut off and/or the sails furled, and its progress therefrom has ceased: Provided, That a craft under power may be used to
retrieve dead or crippled birds; however, crippled birds may not be shot from such craft under power;

By the use or aid of live birds as decoys; although not limited to, it shall be a violation of this paragraph for any person to take migratory waterfowl on an area where tame or captive live ducks or geese are present unless such birds are and have been
for a period of 10 consecutive days prior to such taking, confined within an enclosure which substantially reduces the audibility of their calls and totally conceals such birds from the sight of wild migratory waterfowl;

By the use or aid of recorded or electrically amplified bird calls or sounds, or recorded or electrically amplified imitations of bird calls or sounds;

By means or aid of any motor-driven land, water, or air conveyance, or any sailboat used for the purpose of or resulting in the concentrating, driving, rallying, or stirring up of any migratory bird; or

By the aid of baiting, or on or over any baited area. As used in this paragraph, “baiting” shall mean the placing, exposing, depositing, distributing, or scattering of shelled, shucked, or unshucked corn, wheat or other grain, salt, or other feed so as
to constitute for such birds a lure, attraction or enticement to, on, or over any areas where hunters are attempting to take them; and “baited area” means any area where shelled, shucked, or unshucked corn, wheat or other grain,
salt or other feed whatsoever capable of luring, attracting, or enticing such birds is directly and indirectly placed, exposed, deposited, distributed, or scattered; and such area shall remain a baited area for 10 days following
complete removal of all such corn, wheat or other grain, salt, or other feed. However, nothing in this paragraph shall prohibit:

(i)
The taking of all migratory game birds, including waterfowl, on or over standing crops, flooded standing crops (including aquatics), flooded harvested croplands, grain crops properly shocked on the field where
grown, or grains found scattered solely as the result of normal agricultural planting or harvesting; and

(ii)
The taking of all migratory game birds, except waterfowl, on or over any lands where shelled, shucked, or unshucked corn, wheat or other grain, salt, or other feed has been distributed or scattered as the result
of bona fide agricultural operations or procedures, or as a result of manipulation of a crop or other feed on the land where grown for wildlife management purposes: Provided, that manipulation for wildlife management purposes
does not include the distributing or scattering of grain or other feed once it has been removed from or stored on the field where grown.

Prohibition on Toxic Shot:

(i)
No person shall take waterfowl or coots while possessing loose shot or shot shells loaded with shot other than nontoxic shot, and then of a shot size no larger than size T.

(ii)
No person shall take an aggregate or combination of waterfowl/coots and other species while possessing loose shot or shot shell loaded with shot other than nontoxic shot.

Hunting Methods. Migratory birds on which open seasons are prescribed in this section may be taken by any method except those prohibited in this section. No person shall take migratory game birds:

Closed Seasons. No person shall take migratory game birds during the closed season.

Shooting Hours. No person shall take migratory game birds except during the hours open to shooting.

Daily Limit. No person shall take in any one calendar day, more than the daily bag limit or aggregate daily bag limit, whichever applies.

Wanton Waste Of Migratory Game Birds. No person shall kill or cripple any migratory game bird pursuant to this section without making a reasonable effort to retrieve the bird, and retain it in his or her actual custody, at the place where taken or between
that place and either (1) his or her automobile or principal means of land transportation; or (2) his or her personal abode or temporary or transient place of lodging; or (3) a migratory bird preservation facility; or (4) a post
office; or (5) a common carrier facility.

Possession Prohibitions. No person shall at any time, by any means, or in any manner, possess or have in custody any migratory game bird or part thereof, taken in violation of any provision of subsections 4.0 through 8.0 of this section.

During Closed Season. No person shall possess any freshly killed migratory game birds during the closed season.

Possession Limit. No person shall possess more migratory game birds taken in this State than the possession limit or the aggregate possession limit, whichever applies.

Opening Day of a Season. No person on the opening day of the season shall possess any freshly killed migratory game birds in excess of the daily bag limit.

Field Possession Limit. No person shall possess, have in custody, or transport more than the daily bag limit of migratory game birds, tagged or not tagged, at or between the place where taken and either (1) his automobile or principal means of land
transportation; or (2) his personal abode or temporary or transient place of lodging; or (3) a migratory bird preservation facility; or (4) a post office; or (5) a common carrier facility.

Tagging Requirement. No person shall put or leave any migratory game birds at any place (other than at his or her personal abode), or in the custody of another person for picking, cleaning, processing, shipping, transportation, or storage (including
temporary storage), or for the purpose of having taxidermy services performed, unless such birds have a tag attached, signed by the hunter, stating his or her address, the total number and species of birds, and the date such birds
were killed. Migratory game birds being transported in any vehicle as the personal baggage of the possessor shall not be considered as being in storage or temporary storage.

Custody of Birds of Another. No person shall receive or have in custody any migratory game birds belonging to another person unless such birds are tagged as required by subsection 14.0 of this section.

Possession of Live Birds. Every migratory game bird wounded by hunting and reduced to possession by the hunter shall be immediately killed and become a part of the daily bag limit. No person shall at any time, or by any means, possess or transport live
migratory game birds taken under authority of this section.

Termination of Possession. Subject to all other requirements of this section, the possession of birds taken by any hunter shall be deemed to have ceased when such birds have been delivered by him or her to another person as a gift; or have been delivered
by him or her to a post office, a common carrier, or a migratory bird preservation facility and consigned for transport by the U.S. Postal Service or a common carrier to some person other than the hunter.

Gift of Migratory Game Birds. No person may receive, possess, or give to another, any freshly killed migratory game birds as a gift, except at the personal abodes of the donor or donee, unless such birds have a tag attached, signed by the hunter who
took the birds, stating such hunter’s address, the total number and species of birds, and the date such birds were taken.

Transportation Prohibitions. No person shall at any time, by any means, or in any manner, transport any migratory game bird or part thereof, taken in violation of any provision of subsections 4.0 through 8.0 of this section.

Birds of Another. No person shall transport migratory game birds belonging to another person unless such birds are tagged as required by subsection (14.0) of this section.

Species Identification Requirement. No person shall transport within the United States any migratory game birds, except doves and band-tailed pigeons (Columba fasciata), unless the head or one fully feathered wing remains attached to each such bird
at all times while being transported from the place where taken until they have arrived at the personal abode of the possessor or a migratory bird preservation facility.

Marking Package or Container. No person shall transport by the U.S. Postal Service or a common carrier migratory game birds unless the package or container in which such birds are transported has the name and address of the shipper and the consignee
and an accurate statement of the numbers of each species of birds therein contained clearly and conspicuously marked on the outside thereof.

Exportation Prohibitions. No person shall at any time, by any means, or in any manner, export or cause to be exported, any migratory game bird or part thereof, taken in violation of any provision of subsections 4.0 through 8.0 of this section.

Species Identification Requirement. No person shall export migratory game birds unless one fully feathered wing remains attached to each such bird while being transported from the United States and/or any of its possessions to any foreign country.

Marking Package or Container. No person shall export migratory game birds via the U.S. Postal Service or a common carrier unless the package or container has the name and address of the shipper and the consignee and an accurate statement of the numbers
of each species of birds therein contained clearly and conspicuously marked on the outside thereof.

Importation Limits. No person shall import migratory game birds in excess of the following importation limits:

Doves and Pigeons.

(i)
From any foreign country except Mexico, during any one calendar week beginning on Sunday, not to exceed 25 doves, singly or in the aggregate of all species, and 10 pigeons, singly or in the aggregate of all species.

(ii)
From Mexico, not to exceed the maximum number permitted by Mexican authorities to be taken in any one day: Provided, that if the importer has his or her Mexican hunting permit date-stamped by appropriate Mexican
wildlife authorities on the first day he or she hunts in Mexico, he or she may import the applicable Mexican possession limit corresponding to the days actually hunted during that particular trip.

Waterfowl.

(i)
From any foreign country except Canada and Mexico, during any one calendar week beginning on Sunday, not to exceed 10 ducks, singly or in the aggregate of all species, and five geese including brant, singly or
in the aggregate of all species.

(ii)
From Canada, not to exceed the maximum number permitted to be exported by Canadian authorities.

(iii)
From Mexico, not to exceed the maximum number permitted by Mexican authorities to be taken in any one day: Provided, that if the importer has his or her Mexican hunting permit date-stamped by appropriate Mexican
wildlife authorities on the first day he or she hunts in Mexico, he or she may import the applicable Mexican possession limit corresponding to the days actually hunted during that particular trip.

Birds of Another. No person shall import migratory game birds to another person.

Species Identification Requirement. No person shall import migratory game birds unless each such bird has one fully feathered wing attached, and such wing must remain attached while being transported between the port of entry and the personal abode
of the possessor or between the port of entry and a migratory bird preservation facility.

Foreign Export Permits. No person shall import, possess or transport, any migratory game birds killed in a foreign country unless such birds are accompanied by export permits, tags, or other documentation required by applicable foreign laws or regulations.

Processing Requirement. No person shall import migratory game birds killed in any foreign country, except Canada, unless such birds are dressed (except as required in subsection 28.0), drawn, and the head and feet are removed: Provided, That this shall
not prohibit the importation of legally taken, fully feathered migratory game birds consigned for mounting purposes to a taxidermist who holds a current taxidermist permit and who is also licensed by the U.S. Department of Agriculture
to decontaminate such birds.

Marking of Package or Container. No person shall import migratory game birds via the U.S. Postal Service or a common carrier unless the package or container has the name and address of the shipper and the consignee and an accurate statement of the numbers
of each species of birds therein contained clearly and conspicuously marked on the outside thereof.

Violation of Federal Law. No person shall at any time, by any means or in any manner, take, possess, transport, or export any migratory bird, or any part, nest, or egg of any such bird, in violation of any act of Congress or any regulation issued pursuant
thereto.

Violation of State Law. No person shall at any time, by any means or in any manner, take, possess, transport, or export any migratory bird, or any part, nest, or egg of any such bird, in violation of any applicable law or regulation of any state.

Violation of Foreign Law. No person shall at any time, by any means, or in any manner, import, possess, or transport, any migratory bird, or any part, nest, or egg of any such bird taken, bought, sold, transported, possessed, or exported contrary to
any applicable law or regulation of any foreign country, or state or province thereof.

Tagging Requirement. No migratory bird preservation facility shall receive or have in custody any migratory game birds unless such birds are tagged as required by subsection 14.0 of this section.

Records Required.

No migratory bird preservation facility shall:

Record keeping as required by this section will not be necessary at hunting clubs which do not fully process migratory birds by removal of both the head and wings.

Inspection of Premises. No migratory bird preservation facility shall prevent any person authorized to enforce this section from entering such facilities at all reasonable hours and inspecting the records and the premises where such operations are being
carried.

Commercial Use of Feathers. Any person may possess, purchase, sell, barter, or transport for the making of fishing flies, bed pillows, and mattresses, and for similar commercial uses the feathers of migratory waterfowl (ducks, geese, brant, and swans)
killed by hunting pursuant to this section, or seized and condemned by federal or state game authorities, except that:

No person shall purchase, sell, barter, or offer to purchase, sell, or barter for millinery or ornamental use the feathers of migratory game birds taken under authority of this section; and

No person shall purchase, sell, barter, or offer to purchase, sell, or barter mounted specimens of migratory game birds taken under authority of this section.

Personal Use of Feathers or Skins. Any person for his or her own use may possess, transport, ship, import, and export without a permit the feathers and skins of lawfully taken migratory game birds.

Receive or have in custody any migratory game bird unless accurate records are maintained which can identify each bird received by, or in the custody of, the facility by the name of the person from whom the bird was obtained, and show (i) the number of
each species; (ii) the location where taken; (iii) the date such birds were received; (iv) the name and address of the person from whom such birds were received; (v) the date such birds were disposed of; and (vi) the name and address
of the person to whom such birds were delivered, or

Destroy any records required to be maintained under this section for a period of one year following the last entry on the record.

HISTORY:
Added 1983, Fish and Game Board Reg. No. 940, eff.; amended 2010, Fish and Wildlife Board Reg. eff. May 18, 2010.